Missouri, session 2026, HB3315.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 8, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 8.215, to read as follows:
8.215. 1. As used in this section, the term "public building" means any building
owned or operated by the state or any political subdivision thereof including, but not
limited to, a city, county, or school district.
2. Public buildings, including the employees of the state or political subdivision
that operates within the public building, shall be authorized to display only the
following flags:
(1) The official flag of the United States of America as described in 4 U.S.C.
Section 1;
(2) The official flag of the state of Missouri, as described in section 10.020;
(3) The current official flag of another country, state, or political subdivision of
another country or state;
(4) The official flag of a city, municipality, county, or other political subdivision
of this state;
(5) A flag that represents a branch, unit, or division of the United States
military;
(6) The National League of Families POW/MIA flag described in 36 U.S.C.
Section 902;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3315 2
(7) A flag that represents a federally recognized tribe of American Indians or
Alaska Natives;
(8) A historic version of any flag listed in subdivisions (1) to (7) of this
subsection;
(9) An official public school flag;
(10) An official flag of the United States Olympic & Paralympic Committee, the
International Olympic Committee, or the International Paralympic Committee;
(11) An official flag of an olympiad or paralympiad that occurred or will occur
within the state; or
(12) The flag of an organization authorized to use a public school facility, but
only at the location and during the time in which the organization is authorized to use
such facility.
3. The state auditor shall:
(1) Establish a process to receive and investigate alleged violations of this
section;
(2) Provide notice to the relevant governmental entity of:
(a) Each alleged violation of this section involving the government entity; and
(b) Each violation the state auditor determines to be substantiated, including an
opportunity to cure the violation not to exceed three calendar days; and
(3) If a governmental entity fails to cure a violation of this section in the provided
time frame, pursue an injunction as provided in subsection 4 of this section.
4. If the governmental entity fails to cure a violation of this section within three
days, the prosecuting attorney shall immediately file an injunction in a court of
competent jurisdiction. The court shall give any action filed under this section
expedited consideration and shall have a trial on the issues within seven days and shall
issue a decision within two days after the conclusion of the trial.
5. If the state auditor is granted an injunction requiring the governmental entity
to remove a flag flown in violation of this section and the governmental entity does not
remove the flag within three days, the state auditor may notify local law enforcement of
the governmental entity's failure to comply with court order. The local law
enforcement, upon receipt of the court order requiring removal of the flag, shall
remove the flag.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to individuals who are not
employees of the governmental entity that operates within the public building and who
are lawfully present in or on the grounds of such public building.
✔